trunk/apertium-hbs-slv/apertium-hbs-slv.hbs.metadix
    <pardef n="grof__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ova</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ovâ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ove</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="zglob__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ova</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ovâ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ove</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="koš__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>em</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>evi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eva</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>evâ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eve</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>evi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gost__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iju</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>iju</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="brod__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ova</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ovâ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ove</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bo/g__n">
      <e><p><l>g</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ga</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gu</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ga</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>že</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gu</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gom</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>govi</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>zi</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gova</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>govima</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>zima</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gove</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>govi</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>zi</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>govima</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>zima</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>govima</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>zima</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="klub"><i>klub</i><par n="zglob__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grof"><i>grof</i><par n="grof__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gost"><i>gost</i><par n="gost__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brod"><i>brod</i><par n="brod__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bog"><i>bo</i><par n="bo/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drug"><i>dru</i><par n="bo/g__n"/></e>
